Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1108.01
Viatical settlement broker or viatical settlement provider; disclosure.

Before the initiation of a plan, transaction, or series of transactions, a viatical settlement broker or viatical settlement provider shall fully disclose to an insurer a plan, transaction, or series of transactions to which the viatical settlement broker or viatical settlement provider is a party, to originate, renew, continue, or finance a life insurance policy with the insurer for the purpose of engaging in the business of viatical settlements at anytime prior to or during the first five years after issuance of the policy.

Laws 2008, LB853, § 9.